Utah statutes.
22-3-202.   Distribution to residuary and remainder beneficiaries.
(1)  Each beneficiary described in Subsection 22-3-201(4) is entitled to
receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary's fractional
interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the
distribution date.  If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets
to beneficiaries to whom this section applies, each beneficiary, including one
who does not receive part of the distribution, is entitled, as of each
distribution date, to the net income the fiduciary has received after the date
of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date but has not
distributed as of the current distribution date.
(2)  In determining a beneficiary's share of net income, the following rules
apply:
(a)  The beneficiary is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal
to the beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets
immediately before the distribution date, including assets that later may be
sold to meet principal obligations.
(b)  The beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal
assets must be calculated without regard to property specifically given to a
beneficiary and property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust.
(c)  The beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal
assets must be calculated on the basis of the aggregate value of those assets
as of the distribution date without reducing the value by any unpaid principal
obligation.
(d)  The distribution date for purposes of this section may be the date as of
which the fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is
reasonably near the date on which assets are actually distributed.
(3)  If a fiduciary does not distribute all of the collected but undistributed
net income to each person as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall
maintain appropriate records showing the interest of each beneficiary in that
net income.
(4)  A fiduciary may apply the rules in this section, to the extent that the
fiduciary considers it appropriate, to net gain or loss realized after the
date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date from the
disposition of a principal asset if this section applies to the income from
the asset.
